District of Columbia statutes.
28:8-405

Replacement of lost, destroyed, or wrongfully taken security certificate.

(a)

If an owner of a certificated security, whether in registered or bearer form, claims that the certificate has been lost, destroyed, or wrongfully taken, the issuer shall issue a new certificate if the owner:

(1)

So requests before the issuer has notice that the certificate has been acquired by a protected purchaser;

(2)

Files with the issuer a sufficient indemnity bond; and

(3)

Satisfies other reasonable requirements imposed by the issuer.

(b)

If, after the issue of a new security certificate, a protected purchaser of the original certificate presents it for registration of transfer, the issuer shall register the transfer unless an overissue would result. In that case, the issuer’s liability is governed by § 28:8-210. In addition to any rights on the indemnity bond, an issuer may recover the new certificate from a person to whom it was issued or any person taking under that person, except a protected purchaser.

Dec. 30, 1963, 77 Stat. 744, Pub. L. 88-243, § 1
Mar. 16, 1993, D.C. Law 9-196, § 4, 39 DCR 9165
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-240, § 2, 44 DCR 1087
1973 Ed., § 28:8-405.
1981 Ed., § 28:8-405.
This section is referenced in § 28:8-406.